California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The necessity of controlling beet leafhopper, the only known vector of the curly top virus, is recognized by the Legislature as being in the public benefit. The state’s agricultural business economy could be seriously damaged if measures are not continued to prevent the transmittal of curly top virus by this insect. Since the control program primarily is carried on in uncultivated areas, involving both private and public lands, often far removed from the areas receiving benefits, it is necessary for a state agency to take primary responsibility. The Legislature therefore supports a program jointly funded by industry and public funds whereby protection is provided to both home gardens and commercial crops.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1017.)
-------------------------------------------

6032.

As used in this article “handler” means any person that engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or processing any of the crops vulnerable to damage from curly top virus, as covered by this chapter, which he or she has purchased, or acquired from a producer or which he or she is marketing, selling or processing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. A producer-handler is a producer who operates as a handler as to any such crop produced by him or her. Every producer or producer-handler of agricultural crops susceptible to curly top virus as determined by the secretary, may include, but is not limited to, tomatoes, sugar beets, melons, beans, cucumbers, spinach, and peppers shall pay to the department an assessment on all those crops sold or delivered by him or her to a handler or, in the case of a producer-handler, on those crops marketed by the producer-handler. The full amount of the assessment shall be collected from the producer by the handler at the point and time that the crop is purchased or received by the handler as provided by regulations of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6033.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the assessment collected from producers by handlers or due from producer-handlers shall be paid by the handlers or producer-handlers to the secretary as provided by regulations of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6033.5.

(a) Any assessment that is imposed on the producer pursuant to this article is a personal debt of the producer.

(b) Every handler or producer-handler is personally liable for the payment of the assessment. The failure of the handler or producer-handler to collect the assessment does not exempt the handler or producer-handler from liability, and does not relieve the producer from the obligation to pay the assessment.

(c) Any producer, handler, or producer-handler who fails to file a return or pay the assessment or otherwise comply with Section 6033 shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due, and, in addition, shall pay 1.5 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance of the assessment and the penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6034.

For the purpose of assessment, the following districts are established: District I, Imperial and Riverside Counties; District II, Kern, Kings, Tulare, Fresno, Madera, Merced, Stanislaus, and San Joaquin Counties, and that portion of Los Angeles County lying north of the San Gabriel Mountains; District III, Sacramento, Solano, Yolo, Placer, Sutter, Yuba, Colusa, Butte, and Glenn Counties; District IV, Alameda, Contra Costa, Monterey, San Benito, San Luis Obispo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, and Santa Barbara Counties; additional areas of the state may be established in districts by regulation of the secretary if the secretary finds crops in any such district are subject to damage from curly top virus and that any such district is necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6035.

The secretary may establish the rate of assessment by district and crop and may adjust the assessment rate from time to time, whenever necessary as provided in Section 6036.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6036.

The assessment rate may vary from district to district and from crop to crop based on the degree of vulnerability to damage from curly top virus experienced by those crops in those districts. The rates may also vary in accordance with the protection afforded to those crops in those districts. Any rate or rates established shall be set by regulation. The assessments shall be in total amount sufficient to reimburse the secretary, and whenever feasible, shall not exceed 65 percent of the expenditure by the department in carrying out the beet leafhopper control program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6037.

Any money which is received by the director pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be used for the administration and enforcement of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

6038.

The director may receive moneys from other sources for this program, which shall be deposited into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and used to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

6039.

The secretary shall appoint a Curly Top Virus Control Board consisting of nine members. The membership shall consist of at least one representative of each of the primary crop commodities assessed and shall include representation from each of the districts assessed. The secretary may appoint one additional member on the board, who shall be a public member. The secretary shall appoint one member of the board to serve as chairperson.

Upon the secretary’s request, the board shall submit to the secretary the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, or processor or financially interested in any producer, shipper, or processor, for appointment by the secretary as a public member of the board. The secretary may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the board. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the secretary, the board shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the secretary has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the board shall be filled by appointment by the secretary from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified submitted by the board. The public member of the board shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the board and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6039.5.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that persons appointed to the Curly Top Virus Control Board pursuant to Section 6039 are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such board, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------

6040.

Board members shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board shall be advisory to the secretary and may make recommendations on all matters pertaining to this article including, but not limited to, the annual budget, the adoption, modification, and repeal of regulations and procedures, the use of funds for research, and necessary assessments required to accomplish the purposes of this article as provided in Section 6031.

(b) The secretary shall accept the recommendations of the board if the secretary determines that the recommendations are practicable and in the interest of the industry and the public. The secretary, within 30 days of the decision, shall provide the board with a written statement of reasons for his or her decision if the secretary does not accept a recommendation of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6042.

The board shall meet at the call of its chairman or the secretary or at the request of any three members of the board. The board shall meet at least once a year. Members of the board shall be allowed per diem and mileage in accordance with rules of the Department of Human Resources for attendance at meetings and other board activities authorized by the board and approved by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 16.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6043.

Upon termination of this article, any remaining funds received pursuant to this article shall be refunded on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected during the 12-month period preceding the date of termination, unless the secretary finds the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical computation and remitting of refunds. If the secretary makes such a finding, the funds may be used for beet leafhopper control or research activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 508, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Pierce’s Disease [6045. - 6047.]

6045.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the plant killing bacterium, Xyella Fastidiosa, and the resulting pathogen, Pierce’s disease, and its vectors present a clear and present danger to California’s sixty-billion-dollar grape industry, as well as to many other commodities and plant life.

(b) There exists an ongoing need for at least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) annually in research and programs to combat Pierce’s disease and its vectors in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 171.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Inoperative March 1, 2031.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 6046.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.

(a) There is hereby created in the department the Pierce’s Disease Control Program.

(b) The secretary shall appoint a statewide coordinator and provide an appropriate level of support staffing and logistical support for combating Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(c) (1) There is hereby created the Pierce’s Disease Management Account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(2) The account shall consist of money transferred from the General Fund and money made available from federal, industry, and other sources. Money made available from federal, industry, and other sources shall be available for expenditure
 without regard to fiscal year for the purpose of combating Pierce’s disease or its vectors and for the purpose described in Section 6047.30. State general funds to be used for research shall be expended only when the secretary has received commitments from nonstate sources for at least a 25-percent match for each state dollar to be expended.

(d) The funds appropriated pursuant to this section to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for the purpose of combating Pierce’s disease and its vectors shall be used for costs that are incurred by the state or by local entities for the purpose of research and other efforts to combat Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(e) Whenever, in any county, funds are allocated by the department for local assistance regarding Pierce’s disease and its vectors, those funds shall be made available to a local public entity, or local public entities,
 designated by that county’s board of supervisors.

(f) Funds appropriated for local assistance shall not be allocated to the local public entity until the local public entity creates a Pierce’s disease work plan that is approved by the department. Any funds allocated by the department to a designated local public entity shall be used for activities consistent with the local Pierce’s disease work plan or other programs or work plans approved by the department. It shall be the responsibility of the designated local public entity to develop and implement the local Pierce’s disease work plan. Upon request, the department shall provide consultation to the local public entity regarding its work plan.

(g) The work plan created by the designated local public entity shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) In coordination with the department, the development and delivery of producer outreach information and training to local communities, groups, and individuals to organize their involvement with the work plan and to raise awareness regarding Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(2) In coordination with the department, the development and delivery of ongoing training of the designated local public entity’s employees in the biology, survey, and treatment of Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(3) The identification within the designated local public entity of a local Pierce’s disease coordinator.

(4) The proposed treatment of Pierce’s disease and its vectors. A treatment program shall comply with all applicable laws and regulations and shall be conducted in an environmentally responsible manner.

(5) In coordination with the department, the development and implementation of a data collection system to track and report new infestations of Pierce’s disease and its vectors in a manner respectful of property and other rights of those affected.

(h) On an annual basis, while funds appropriated by this section are available for encumbrance, the department shall review the progress of each local public entity’s activities regarding Pierce’s disease and its vectors and, as needed, make recommendations regarding those activities to the local public entity.

(i) This article shall become inoperative on March 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   (AB 1861)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.    Note: Termination clause affects Article 8, comprising Sections 6045 to 6047.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.

The secretary may establish, maintain, and enforce regulations consistent with the intent of the Legislature as expressed in this article as may be necessary to interpret, clarify, or implement this article. This authority shall be liberally construed to effectuate the intent of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective May 19, 2000.   Inoperative March 1, 2031.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 6046.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Pierce’s Disease and the Glassy-winged Sharpshooter [6047.1. - 6047.30.]

6047.1.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) The state’s agricultural business economy could be seriously damaged if measures are not taken to prevent the transmittal of the plant killing bacterium that causes Pierce’s disease and to contain its vectors, particularly the glassy-winged sharpshooter, and if measures are not taken to prevent or inhibit infestations by other designated pests and diseases. Furthermore, progress made by winegrape growers and others in the adoption of integrated pest management and sustainable farming practices is threatened by these destructive pests and diseases.

(b) The funding to accomplish the purposes of this article shall be derived from an
 assessment on all grapes grown in California and crushed for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, or beverage brandy.

(c) This article is not intended to establish a precedent, or to supersede, or to reduce or in any way alter government funding of the effort to combat Pierce’s disease and other pests in this state.

(d) The purposes of this article are enhanced by the many and varied efforts of other agricultural commodities’ industries to combat this bacterium and its vectors and other designated pests and diseases.

(e) This article is enacted for the protection of the winegrape industry and is also declared to be enacted in the public interest and in the exercise of the police power of the state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(f) The assessments shall be collected and expended for purposes consistent with Sections 6046 and 6047.30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 325, Sec. 2.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.2.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall govern its construction:

(a) “Board” means the Pierce’s Disease and Glassy-winged Sharpshooter Board.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(c) “Marketing season” begins July 1 of each year and ends June 30 of the next year.

(d) “Producer” means a grower, including a cooperative, of grapes in California for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, or beverage brandy.

(e) “Processor” means a processor
 who crushes grapes in California for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, or beverage brandy.

(f) “Person” means a producer, processor, or any other entity that holds title to grapes subject to assessment.

(g) “Purchase” means the taking by sale, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, issue or reissue, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in property. For purposes of this subdivision, “sale” shall consist of the passing of title from the seller to the buyer for a price.

(h) “Purchased grapes” means grapes grown in California, crushed by a processor for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, or beverage brandy, and purchased from a person considered a separate entity from the purchaser.

(i) “Grapes not purchased”
 means all other grapes grown in California and crushed by a processor for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, or beverage brandy, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Grapes grown by a person who is not considered a separate entity from the processor or who is a member of the processor cooperative.

(2) Grapes not purchased and crushed to the account of a person who retains ownership of the grapes.

(j) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(k) “Other designated pests and diseases” means pests and diseases designated by the secretary as provided in Section 6047.30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 325, Sec. 3.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.3.

(a) Within 90 days after the effective date of this section, the secretary shall create in the department the Pierce’s Disease and Glassy-winged Sharpshooter Board, which shall consist of at least 14, but not more than 15 members, of which eight shall be representatives of producers who are not also processors and six shall be representatives of processors who are also producers.

(b) The secretary shall appoint the members of the board from recommendations received from the industry. In making the appointments, the secretary shall select no more than one person from a producer or processor entity and shall ensure that there is representation on the board from each of the major grape production areas in the state.

(c) The secretary may appoint one additional member to the board, from nominees received from the board, who shall serve as the public member. The public member shall represent the interests of the public in all matters coming before the board and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the board.

(d) The secretary and other appropriate individuals, as determined by the board, shall be nonvoting ex officio members of the board.

(e) It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that persons appointed to the board are intended to represent and further the interests of the industry concerned, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the board, the industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 3.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.3.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the secretary, upon the recommendation of the board, may contract with any nonprofit authoritative scientific body with expertise in agricultural issues in order to expedite research relating to the eradication of Pierce’s disease.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6047.35 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 12, Sec. 3.   Effective June 9, 2005.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.4.

(a) The powers of the board shall be the following:

(1) Submit recommendations to the secretary on, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Selection of officers.

(B) Terms of office for board members.

(C) Annual assessment rate.

(D) Annual budget.

(E) Expenditures authorized under Sections 6047.5 and 6047.30.

(2) Receive money from the assessment and other sources.

(3) Adopt, amend, and rescind all proper and necessary bylaws and procedures.

(4) Coordinate its activities with the secretary’s science advisory board and agricultural/governmental advisory task force.

(b) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board. The vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum constitutes an act of the board, except for actions taken pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6047.7, which shall require a majority of the vote of the board. The board may continue to transact business at a meeting where a quorum is initially present, notwithstanding the withdrawal of members, provided any action is approved by the requisite majority of the required quorum.

(c) As
 authorized by the board, members of the board may receive per diem and mileage in accordance with the rules of the Department of Human Resources for attendance at meetings and other approved board activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 17.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.5.

(a) Expenditure of the funds pursuant to this article shall be restricted to the following:

(1) Reasonable administrative expenses of the board and the department, subject to the limitation in Section 6047.12.

(2) The collection, enforcement, deposit, and handling of the assessments.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 6047.12, costs to conduct a referendum.

(4) Subject to subdivision (d) of Section 6047.1, research and other activities related to the transmittal of the plant killing Pierce’s disease bacterium and its vectors, particularly the glassy-winged sharpshooter, including, but not limited to, research of integrated pest management and other sustainable industry practices. The disbursement of research funds collected pursuant to Section 6047.7 shall be on a competitive bid basis, shall be exempt from the requirements of Sections 12798 and 12798.6, and may be encumbered with existing resources beyond the termination date of this statute.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), data and related information and materials produced during the course of research conducted pursuant to this article that are in the possession of the department, the board, or any entity engaged in research funded pursuant to this article, shall be confidential and shall not be released for any purpose, except to the extent that they are included in any final publication of research, or except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this article.

(c) The restrictions in this section shall not apply to research conducted by the University of California or by other public agencies or public institutions that are subject to interagency agreements, except to the extent that they are consistent with policies of the entity engaged in research funded pursuant to this article on sponsored research and publication, which may allow for, among other things, a short period of review by the board in advance of publication.

(d) Processors subject to this article and expenditure of the funds collected pursuant to this article are subject to audit by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 6.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.6.

The secretary shall accept the recommendations of the board unless he or she determines that the recommendations are not practicable or in the interest of the industry or the public. The secretary shall provide the board with the reasons for his or her decision within 15 days if the secretary does not accept a recommendation of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 741, Sec. 4.   Effective September 20, 2002.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.7.

(a) During the first marketing season, beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30, 2002, the annual assessment shall be three dollars ($3) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) assessed pursuant to Section 6047.9 for all grapes subject to assessment under this article. The department shall notify each processor of the established assessment as soon as practicable. For each marketing season thereafter, the following shall apply:

(1) An annual assessment shall be recommended by the board and submitted to the secretary for
 approval in an amount not to exceed three dollars ($3) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) assessed pursuant to Section 6047.9 for all grapes subject to assessment under this article.

(2) The department shall notify each processor of the established assessment rate by July 15, or as soon thereafter as possible.

(b) In no event shall there be an assessment on the following:

(1) Material other than grapes, and defects, or other weight adjustments deducted from the gross weight ticket.

(2) Any raisin-distilling material.

(3) Grapes for which an assessment has been withheld, paid, or is already owed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 231, Sec. 3.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.8.

(a) The assessment is the obligation of the producer.

(b) For purchased grapes, the processor who purchases the grapes shall act on behalf of the person from whom the grapes were purchased in collecting and remitting the assessment, shall deduct the assessment from moneys owed by the processor, and shall pay the assessment as provided in this article.

(c) For grapes not purchased, the processor who crushes the grapes shall do the following:

(1) Charge the person who retains ownership of the grapes the assessment and pay the assessment as provided in this article.

(2) Be responsible for the remittance of the assessment for the crushing of grapes from persons not considered a separate entity from the processor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.9.

(a) For purposes of calculating the amount to be collected by the processor for purchased grapes, the assessment shall be based on the gross dollar value of the grapes, which is the gross dollar amount payable for the grapes before any deductions for governmental assessments and fees.

(b) For purposes of calculating the assessment for grapes not purchased, the assessment shall be based on the following:

(1) The tonnage of grapes delivered less material other than grapes and defects or other weight adjustments deducted from gross weight.

(2) The weighted average price per ton delivered basis
 purchased from all nonrelated sources for wine, concentrate, juice, wine vinegar, and beverage brandy by processors, by type, variety, and reporting district where grown for the grapes delivered, sources as reported by the secretary pursuant to Section 55601.5 for the immediately preceding marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 172.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.10.

(a) All assessments payable under this article shall be remitted to the department no later than January 31 of each year. The department shall deposit the assessments remitted into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) In no event shall any proprietary information specified in Section 6047.13 that is received by the department in collecting assessments be transferred to the board.

(c) Processors shall not charge producers an administrative fee for collecting and remitting assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.    Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.11.

Any producer who disputes the amount of the assessment may file a claim with the department. The producer shall prove his or her claim by a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.12.

(a) Expenditures charged by the department and the board for administrative purposes shall not exceed a total of 14 percent of the assessments collected pursuant to this article. Administrative purposes shall include, but not be limited to, all auditing expenses and all costs and attorney’s fees resulting from, or relating to, litigation involving this article against the department, or the board and its members and agents, and expenses associated with Section 6047.4 and paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6047.5.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Joint Legislative Audit Committee and the State Auditor shall maintain independent authority to audit the expenditure of industry
 assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 73.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.13.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the board or the department from producers, processors, or any other source, including, but not limited to, the name, addresses, and assessments collected from individual producers and processors in the possession of the board or the department, including processors’ lists of their producers and the assessment of individual producers, is confidential and shall not be disclosed, except when required by a court order issued upon a showing of good cause and that the information is necessary to a judicial proceeding involving this article.

(b) Disclosure, as permitted under this section, shall be conducted in camera by the court.

(c) The court shall, in the court’s discretion, issue orders restraining a party or parties to a judicial proceeding involving this article from disseminating any proprietary information to the public or any other person not a party to that judicial proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective June 9, 2005.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.14.

(a) The sole remedy against any producer who fails to pay the assessment and against any processor who fails to collect and remit assessments within the time required by the secretary shall be an action to collect the delinquent assessments and payment to the secretary a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, payment to the secretary of 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(b) A producer may not bring any claim against a processor for damages, or otherwise, in connection with the assessment or the required deduction by the processor of the moneys owed to the producer as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.15.

Upon termination of this article, and based upon a recommendation of the board subject to approval by the secretary, any collected assessments not required to defray financial obligations incurred pursuant to this article shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected during the marketing season immediately preceding the date of termination or paid to any existing state or federal program engaged in disease prevention or research activities in the grape industry. The assessments refunded to processors shall be paid to producers if the assessment was previously deducted from moneys owed to the producer by the processor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.16.

No action in law or equity may be brought against any members or agent of the board, nor shall any member or agent of the board be personally liable for the actions of the board or the department. No member or agent of the board is responsible individually in any way to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as a principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member or agent of the board, is responsible individually for an act or omission of any other member or agent of the board, or the department. Liability is several and not joint, and no member or agent of the board is liable for the default of any other member or agent of the board, or the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.17.

This article shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.18.

This article shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   Effective July 25, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.19.

(a) On or before December 31 of every year, the secretary, after consultation with the board, shall make publicly available on the department’s internet website, a report on the status of this article and Article 8 (commencing with Section 6045), including, but not limited to, program expenditures, progress, and ongoing priorities in
 combating Pierce’s disease and its vectors in California for the previous calendar year.

(b) The report shall include a financial accounting, including the distribution of industry assessments and any unexpended amount on deposit, of the department’s efforts to contain Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(c) If this article does not become inoperative on an earlier date pursuant to Section 6047.20 or 6047.27, this article shall remain in effect only until March 1, 2031, and in any case is repealed as of that date, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before March 1,
 2031,
 deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.   (AB 1861)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Article 8.5, comprising Sections 6047.1 to 6047.30. See also repeal in Section 6047.29.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.20.
